District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-221.18

Suits after dissolution.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1319, ch. 854, § 785
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(3), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-221.18.
1981 Ed., § 29-418.
1973 Ed., § 29-718.